District of Columbia statutes.
1-619.03

Personnel authority pilot programs.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, or any other provision of law or regulation, and consistent with § 1-204.22 the Mayor may implement pilot personnel programs in the area of incentive awards as related to performance, including gainsharing. Pilot programs may be established during any control period as defined in § 47-393, to help ensure successful implementation of the transformation of the District of Columbia government workforce.

(b)

The Mayor may issue rules and regulations to implement these programs.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1903
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(u)(3), 45 DCR 2464

History

Mayor and Council members, coverage, see § 1-602.02.
Merit system, effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 1-620.3.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act Pilot Program Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-47, April 27, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 1508).

Temporary Addition of Section

Construction of Law

Construction of Law 12-124

Section 301 of D.C. Law 12-124 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as superseding the provisions of the National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government Improvement Act of 1997, approved August 5, 1997 (Public Law 105-33; 111 Stat. 712), except that § 47-395.04(b)(3) is expressly superseded. Further, nothing in the act shall be construed as superseding the provisions of § 47-391.01 et seq. or of § 164 of the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1998, approved November 19, 1997 (Public Law 105-100; 111 Stat. 2160).

Applicability of § 101(u) of D.C. Law 12-124: Section 401(c) of D.C. Law 12-124, as amended by § 60 of D.C. Law 12-264, provided that § 101(h), (l), (m), (n), (o)(2) through (5), (q), (r), (t), (u), (w), and (y) of the act shall apply as of October 21, 1998.

Editor's Notes